apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="sp/ørje_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>urd</l>   <r>ørje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>urd</l>   <r>ørje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>   <r>ørje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>  <r>ørje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>  <r>ørje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørjande</l><r>ørje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>    <r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørj</l><r>ørje</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_no-cp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørjast</l><r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>urd</l>   <r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>   <r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>    <r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urde</l>  <r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>urte</l>  <r>ørje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="g/jelle__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ollen</l>  <r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ollen</l> <r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jellande</l><r>jelle<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>jell</l>  <r>jelle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jell</l><r>jelle</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jellast</l><r>jelle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>jelle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>jelle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jell</l>  <r>jelle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>   <r>jelle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ine__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>inen</l>   <r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inen</l>  <r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ine</l>   <r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ini</l>   <r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inne</l>  <r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inne</l>  <r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inande</l><r>ine<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>in</l>    <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l><r>ine</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inast</l> <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ine</l>   <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ini</l>   <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>    <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ein</l>   <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sk/jelve__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>olven</l>  <r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olven</l> <r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olve</l>  <r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olvi</l>  <r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olvne</l> <r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olvne</l> <r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jelvande</l><r>jelve<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>jelv</l>  <r>jelve<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jelv</l><r>jelve</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jelvast</l><r>jelve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olve</l>  <r>jelve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olvi</l>  <r>jelve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jelv</l>  <r>jelve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alv</l>   <r>jelve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="rine">        <i>r</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjelle"><i>g</i><par n="g/jelle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grine"><i>gr</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kvine"><i>kv</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skjelve"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/jelve__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="spørje etter">      <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørje_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>etter</ig></e>
<e lm="spørje seg for">      <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørje_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>for</ig></e>
<e lm="spørje seg sjølv">      <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørje_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>sjølv</ig></e>
<e lm="spørje ut">      <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørje_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut</ig></e>
<e lm="kaldfline"><i>kaldfl</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sigrine"><i>sigr</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fline"><i>fl</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skine"><i>sk</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vrine"><i>vr</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gline"><i>gl</i><par n="r/ine__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="smørje inn"><i>sm</i><par n="sp/ørje_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>inn</ig></e>
